Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,123
Duty of Attorney General or county attorney to bring quo warranto action; when.

The Attorney General or the county attorney of the proper county must file such information when directed to do so by the Governor, the Legislative Assembly, or the district court.

R.S.1867, Code § 706, p. 517;

R.S.1913, § 8330;

Laws 1921, c. 126, § 2, p. 536;

C.S.1922, § 9282;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,114;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,123.